Massachusetts, session 194th, H2887.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after paragraph (h ½) the following paragraph :–
(h ¾) Any school nurse who is a member in service of the teacher’s retirement system or
a municipal or city of Boston or state retirement system who is employed in a school approved
by the department of education may receive creditable service for any period or periods of work
experience in the nursing field. No credit shall be allowed until such member has paid into the
annuity savings fund of the system before any retirement allowance becomes effective for such
member, in one sum, or in installments, upon such terms and conditions as the board may
prescribe, makeup payments of an amount equal to 10 percent of the regular annual
compensation of the member when said member entered the retirement system for each year of
service so purchased, plus buy back interest. No credit shall be allowed and no payment shall be
accepted under this paragraph until the member shall have completed ten or more years of
of 2

membership service. The maximum creditable service allowable under this paragraph for any
member shall not exceed three years. Members in service of a retirement system eligible for said
creditable service under this act shall make application for said creditable service within ninety
days of being notified by the retirement board of their eligibility after becoming vested in the
retirement system or for currently eligible members, within ninety days of the effective date of
this act.
of 2